Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-222
Certification request; requirements; acceptance.

The certification request shall be prepared by the certifying court, signed by the judge presiding at the hearing, and forwarded to the Supreme Court by the clerk of the certifying court under its official seal. The Supreme Court may require the original or copies of all or any portion of the record before the certifying court to be filed with the certification order if, in the opinion of the Supreme Court, the record or portion thereof may be necessary in answering the questions. The Supreme Court shall determine whether to accept the certification request within sixty days following receipt by the court of the request. If the court fails to act on the request within sixty days of receipt, the request shall be deemed rejected.

Laws 1982, LB 724, § 4.